Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 3.1 Certificates of Title and Security Interests

31-3.1-1.
Certificate of title required.

Except as provided in §

31-3.1-2

, every owner of a vehicle which is in this state and for which no certificate of title has been issued by the division of motor vehicles shall make application to the division for a certificate of title of the vehicle.

The division of motor vehicles shall not register or renew the registration of a vehicle unless a certificate of title has been issued by the division to the owner or an application for title has been delivered by the owner to the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-2.
Exclusions.

No certificate of title need be obtained for:

A vehicle owned by the United States unless it is registered in this state;

A vehicle owned by a manufacturer or dealer and held for sale, even though incidentally moved on the highway, or used for purposes of testing or demonstration; or a vehicle used by a manufacturer solely for testing;

A vehicle owned by a nonresident of this state and not required by law to be registered in this state;

A vehicle regularly engaged in the interstate transportation of persons or property for which a currently effective certificate of title has been issued in another state;

A vehicle moved solely by human or animal power;

An implement of husbandry;

Special mobile equipment;

A self-propelled wheelchair or tricycle for a person with a disability;

A trailer without motive power and designed for carrying property, to be drawn by a motor vehicle and having a gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) of three thousand pounds (3,000 lbs.) or less. As used herein, the term “trailer” does not include a travel trailer, a fifth-wheel trailer, or park trailer, as defined in §

31-1-3

;

Motorized bicycles; and

A mobile home or other nonmotorized dwelling unit built on a chassis greater than eight feet six inches (8´ 6") in width or sixty feet (60´) in length and containing complete electrical, plumbing, and sanitary facilities, and designed to be installed on a temporary or permanent foundation for permanent living quarters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 58, § 4; P.L. 1978, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 308, art. 2, § 8.

31-3.1-3.
Optional certificate of title.

The owner of an implement of husbandry or special mobile equipment may apply for and obtain a certificate of title on it. All of the provisions of this chapter are applicable to a certificate of title so issued, except that a person who receives a transfer of an interest in the vehicle without knowledge of the certificate of title is not prejudiced by reason of the existence of the certificate, and the perfection of a security interest under this chapter is not effective until the lienholder has complied with the provisions of applicable law which otherwise relate to the perfection of security interests in personal property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-4.
Application for first certificate of title.

The application for the first certificate of title of a vehicle in this state shall be made by the owner to the division of motor vehicles on the form it prescribes and shall contain:

The name, residence, and mailing address of the owner;

A description of the vehicle including, so far as the following data exists: its make, model, identifying number, type of body, the number of cylinders, and whether new or used;

The date of purchase by the applicant, the name and address of the person from whom the vehicle was acquired, and the names and addresses of any lienholders in the order of their priority and the dates of their security agreements; and

Any further information the division reasonably requires to identify the vehicle and to enable it to determine whether the owner is entitled to a certificate of title, and the existence or nonexistence of security interests in the vehicle.

If the application refers to a vehicle purchased from a dealer, it shall contain the name and address of any lienholder holding a security interest created or reserved at the time of the sale and the date of this security agreement and be signed by the dealer as well as the owner, and the dealer or buyer shall promptly mail or deliver the application to the division. The buyer shall also complete a security lien statement as provided in §

31-3.1-19

.

If the application refers to a vehicle last previously registered in another state or country, the application shall contain or be accompanied by:

Any certificate of title issued by the other state or country;

Any other information and documents the division reasonably requires to establish the ownership of the vehicle and the existence or nonexistence of a security interest in it; and

The certificate of a person authorized by law that the identifying number of the vehicle has been inspected and found to conform to the description given in the application, or any other proof of the identity of the vehicle the division reasonably requires.

Chiefs of police, their designees, who shall be employees of the police department, or, in an emergency, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, or his or her designee, shall conduct the inspection of the vehicle identifying number, and certify, on forms provided by the division, that it has been found to conform to the description given in the application or any other form of the identity of the vehicle the division reasonably requires. An inspection and certification fee of ten dollars ($10.00) shall be assessed against the applicant by the city or town whose police conduct the inspection. The inspection by the chiefs of police, or their designees, who shall be employees of the police department, shall be conducted at the local city or town police station, at a municipally owned building, or at a licensed new motor vehicle dealership. This provision eliminates the responsibility for the inspection to be performed by division personnel.

Upon inspection of the vehicle identifying number as provided for in this section, each vehicle identification number shall be submitted for a National Crime Information Center (NCIC) check, and the results, sometimes called the “NCIC check number,” shall be attached to the TR-5 form provided by the division or to any other form consistent with this provision that the division might reasonably require.

No person, partnership, or corporation shall charge a fee in excess of ten dollars ($10.00) for obtaining a certificate of title for a motor vehicle.

In the town of Exeter, the town sergeant, or designees, who shall also be employees of the Exeter town sergeant’s office, are authorized to conduct the inspection required by this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 245, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 23, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 171, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 190, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 191, § 1, effective July 8, 2021.

31-3.1-5.
Examination of records.

The division of motor vehicles, receiving application for a first certificate of title, shall check the identifying number of the vehicle shown in the application against the records of vehicles required to be maintained by §

31-3.1-6

and against the record of stolen and converted vehicles required to be maintained by §

31-9-9

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-6.
Issuance and records.

The division of motor vehicles shall file each application received and, when satisfied as to its genuineness and regularity and that the applicant is entitled to the issuance of a certificate of title, shall issue, upon payment of a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00), a certificate of title of the vehicle.

The division of motor vehicles shall maintain a record of all certificates of title issued by it:

Under a distinctive title number assigned to the vehicle;

Under the identifying number of the vehicle;

Alphabetically, under the name of the owner; and

At the discretion of the division of motor vehicles, in any other method it determines.

Title searches, lien searches, and other transactions not cited and involving titles shall be conducted upon payment of a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

Beginning in fiscal year 2015 all fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Rhode Island highway maintenance account.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 13, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 15, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 21, § 2.

31-3.1-7.
Contents and effect of certificate.

Each certificate of title issued by the division of motor vehicles shall contain:

The date issued;

The name and address of the owner;

The names and addresses of any lienholders, in the order of priority as shown on the application or, if the application is based on a certificate of title, as shown on the certificate;

The title number assigned to the vehicle;

A description of the vehicle including, so far as the following data exists: its make, model, identifying number, type of body, number of cylinders, whether new or used, and, if a new vehicle, the date of the first sale of the vehicle for use; and

Any other data the division of motor vehicles prescribes.

Unless a bond is filed as provided in §

31-3.1-9(2)

, a distinctive certificate of title shall be issued for a vehicle last previously registered in another state or country the laws of which do not require that lienholders be named on a certificate of title to perfect their security interests. The certificate shall contain the legend “this vehicle may be subject to an undisclosed lien” and may contain any other information the division of motor vehicles prescribes. If no notice of a security interest in the vehicle is received by the division within four (4) months from the issuance of the distinctive certificate of title, it shall, upon application and surrender of the distinctive certificate, issue a certificate of title in ordinary form.

The certificate of title shall contain forms for assignment and warranty of title by the owner, and for assignment and warranty of title by a dealer, and may contain forms for application for a certificate of title by a transferee, the naming of a lienholder, and the assignment or release of the security interest of a lienholder.

A certificate of title issued by the division of motor vehicles is prima facie evidence of the facts appearing on it.

A certificate of title for a vehicle is not subject to garnishment, attachment, execution, or other judicial process, but this subsection does not prevent a lawful levy upon the vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-8.
Delivery.

The certificate of title shall be mailed to the first lienholder named in it or, if none, to the owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-9.
Registration without certificate of title — Bond.

If the division of motor vehicles is not satisfied as to the ownership of the vehicle or that there are no undisclosed security interests in it, the division of motor vehicles may register the vehicle but shall either:

Withhold issuance of a certificate of title until the applicant presents documents reasonably sufficient to satisfy the division of motor vehicles as to the applicant’s ownership of the vehicle and that there are no undisclosed security interests in it; or

As a condition of issuing a certificate of title, require the applicant to file with the division of motor vehicles a bond in the form prescribed by the division of motor vehicles and executed by the applicant, and either accompanied by the deposit of cash with the division of motor vehicles or also executed by a person authorized to conduct a surety business in this state. The bond shall be in the amount equal to one and one-half (11/2) times the value of the vehicle, as determined by the division of motor vehicles. This amount will be conditioned to indemnify any prior owner and lienholder and any subsequent purchaser of the vehicle or person acquiring any security interest in it, and their respective successors in interest, against any expense, loss, or damage, including reasonable attorney’s fees, by reason of the issuance of the certificate of title of the vehicle or an account of any defect in or undisclosed security interest upon the right, title, and interest of the applicant in and to the vehicle. Any interested person has a right of action to recover on the bond for any breach of its conditions, but the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons shall not exceed the amount of the bond. The bond, and any deposit accompanying it, shall be returned at the end of three (3) years or prior to that time if the vehicle is no longer registered in this state and the currently valid certificate of title is surrendered to the division of motor vehicles unless the division of motor vehicles has been notified of the pendency of an action to recover on the bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-10.
Refusing certificate of title.

The division of motor vehicles shall refuse issuance of a certificate of title if any required fee is not paid or if it has reasonable grounds to believe that:

The applicant is not the owner of the vehicle;

The application contains a false or fraudulent statement;

The applicant fails to furnish required information or documents or any additional information the division reasonably requires; or

The applicant fails to furnish evidence that any tax due with reference to the motor vehicle pursuant to the provisions of chapters 18 and 19 of title 44 has been paid in accordance with regulations prescribed by the tax administrator, and on any forms that shall be approved by the tax administrator and the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 263, art. VI, § 1.

31-3.1-11.
Lost, stolen or mutilated certificates.

If a certificate of title is lost, stolen, mutilated, destroyed, or becomes illegible, the first lienholder or, if none, the owner or legal representative of the owner named in the certificate, as shown by the records of the division of motor vehicles, shall promptly apply for and may obtain a duplicate upon furnishing information satisfactory to the division of motor vehicles and pay a fifty dollar ($50.00) fee. The duplicate certificate of title shall contain the legend “this is a duplicate certificate and may be subject to the rights of a person under the original certificate.” It shall be mailed to the first lienholder named in it or, if none, to the owner.

The division of motor vehicles shall not issue a certificate of title to a transferee upon application made on a duplicate until fifteen (15) days after receipt of the application.

A person recovering an original certificate of title for which a duplicate has been issued shall promptly surrender the original certificate to the division of motor vehicles.

A person applying for a duplicate title may designate an automobile dealer as the designated recipient of the duplicate title provided, that there is no current lien holder and the applicant/owner signs an affidavit stating that the vehicle has been sold or traded to the dealer in such form as designated by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 13, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 15, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 412, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 9, § 1.

31-3.1-12.
Transfer.

If the owner transfers his or her interest in a vehicle, other than by the creation of a security interest, he or she shall, at the time of the delivery of the vehicle, execute an assignment and warranty of title to the transferee in the space provided for it on the certificate or as the division of motor vehicles prescribes, and cause the certificate and assignment to be mailed or delivered to the transferee or to the division of motor vehicles.

Except as provided in §

31-3.1-13

, the transferee shall, promptly after delivery to him or her of the vehicle, execute the application for a new certificate of title in the space provided for it on the certificate or as the division of motor vehicles prescribes, and cause the certificate and application to be mailed or delivered to the division of motor vehicles.

Upon request of the owner or transferee, a lienholder in possession of the certificate of title shall, unless the transfer was a breach of his or her security agreement, either deliver the certificate to the transferee for delivery to the division of motor vehicles or upon receipt from the transferee of the owner’s assignment, the transferee’s application for a new certificate, the registration card, license plates and the required fee of fifty dollars ($50.00), mail or deliver them to the division of motor vehicles. The delivery of the certificate does not affect the rights of the lienholder under his or her security agreement.

If a security interest is reserved or created at the time of the transfer, the certificate of title shall be retained by or delivered to the person who becomes the lienholder, and the parties shall comply with the provisions of §

31-3.1-20

.

Except as provided in §

31-3.1-13

and as between the parties, a transfer by an owner is not effective until the provisions of this section and §

31-3.1-15

, have been complied with. However, an owner who has delivered possession of the vehicle to the transferee and has complied with the provisions of this section and §

31-3.1-15

, requiring action by him or her, is not liable as owner for any subsequent damages resulting from operation of the vehicle.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall prescribe and/or approve a power-of-attorney form which complies with § 408(d)(1)(C) of the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act, 49 U.S.C. § 32705(b)(2), as amended, and any regulations promulgated pursuant to it, and this form may be used in connection with transfers of title under this section to the full extent permitted by federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 13, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 15, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 58; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 9, § 1.

31-3.1-13.
Transfer to or from dealer — Records.

If a dealer buys a vehicle and holds it for resale and procures the certificate of title from the owner or the lienholder within ten (10) days after delivery to him of the vehicle, the dealer need not send the certificate to the division of motor vehicles. However, upon transferring the vehicle to another person other than by the creation of a security interest, the dealer shall promptly execute the assignment and warranty of title by a dealer, showing the names and addresses of the transferee and of any lienholder holding a security interest created or reserved at the time of the resale and the date of the security agreement, in the spaces provided for it on the certificate or as the division of motor vehicles prescribes, and mail or deliver the certificate to the division of motor vehicles with the transferee’s application for a new certificate.

Every dealer shall maintain for five (5) years a record in the form the division of motor vehicles prescribes of every vehicle bought, sold, or exchanged by the dealer, or received by the dealer for sale or exchange, which shall be open to inspection by a representative of the division of motor vehicles or peace officer during reasonable business hours.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-14.
Transfer by operation of law.

If the interest of any owner in a vehicle passes to another other than by voluntary transfer, the transferee shall, except as provided in subsection (b), promptly mail or deliver to the division of motor vehicles the last certificate of title, if available, proof of the transfer, and his or her application for a new certificate in the form the division of motor vehicles prescribes.

If the interest of the owner is terminated or the vehicle is sold under a security agreement by a lienholder named in the certificate of title, the transferee shall promptly mail or deliver to the division of motor vehicles the last certificate of title, his or her application for a new certificate in the form the division of motor vehicles prescribes, and an affidavit made by or on behalf of the lienholder that the vehicle was repossessed and that the interest of the owner was lawfully terminated or sold pursuant to the terms of the security agreement. If the lienholder succeeds to the interest of the owner and holds the vehicle for resale, the lienholder need not secure a new certificate of title but, upon transfer to another person shall promptly mail or deliver to the transferee or to the division of motor vehicles, the certificate, affidavit, and other documents and articles required to be sent to the division of motor vehicles by the transferee.

A person holding a certificate of title whose interest in the vehicle has been extinguished or transferred other than by voluntary transfer shall mail or deliver the certificate to the division of motor vehicles upon request of the division of motor vehicles. The delivery of the certificate pursuant to the request of the division of motor vehicles does not affect the rights of the person surrendering the certificate, and the action of the division of motor vehicles in issuing a new certificate of title as provided in this section is not conclusive upon the rights of an owner or lienholder named in the old certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-15.
Fees — Registration cards.

An application for a certificate of title shall be accompanied by the registration card, and the required fee when mailed or delivered to the division of motor vehicles.

An application for the naming of a lienholder or his assignee on a certificate of title shall be accompanied by the registration card and the required fee when mailed or delivered to the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 17, § 1.

31-3.1-16.
Issuance of new certificate.

The division of motor vehicles, upon receipt of a properly assigned certificate of title, with an application for a new certificate of title, the required fee and any other documents and articles required by law, shall issue a new certificate of title in the name of the transferee as owner and mail it to the first lienholder named in it or, if none, to the owner.

The division of motor vehicles upon receipt of an application for a new certificate of title by a transferee other than by voluntary transfer, with proof of the transfer, the required fee and any other documents and articles required by law, shall issue a new certificate of title in the name of the transferee as owner. If the outstanding certificate of title is not delivered to it, the division of motor vehicles shall make demand for the certificate from its holder.

The division of motor vehicles shall file and retain for five (5) years every surrendered certificate of title, the file to be maintained so as to permit the tracing of title of the vehicle designated in it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-16.1.
Electronic recording of security interests.

The registrar is authorized to develop, establish and maintain an electronic data and communications system with banks, credit or other financial institutions for the purpose of electronically recording the existence of security interests under the provisions of this chapter. Where an electronic lien recording method is employed, the registrar may waive the issuance and mailing of the certificate of title to the lienholder.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 639, § 1.

31-3.1-17.
Scrapping, dismantling or destroying vehicle.

Any individual, company, or corporation that scraps, dismantles, or destroys a vehicle at its final disposition site in this state shall immediately cause the certificate of title or the salvage certificate of title to be mailed or delivered to the division of motor vehicles for cancellation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 221, § 5.

31-3.1-18.
Excepted liens and security interests.

This chapter does not apply to or affect:

A lien given by statute or rule of law to a supplier of services or materials for the vehicle;

A lien given by statute to the United States, this state or any political subdivision of this state; or

A security interest in a vehicle created by a manufacturer or dealer who holds the vehicle for sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-19.
Perfection of security interests.

Unless excepted by §

31-3.1-18

, a security interest in a vehicle of a type for which a certificate of title is required is not valid against creditors of the owner or subsequent transferees or lienholders of the vehicle unless perfected as provided in this chapter.

A security interest is perfected by the delivery to the division of motor vehicles of the existing certificate of title, if any, an application for a certificate of title containing the name and address of the lienholder, and the date of his or her security agreement. A security interest may also be perfected by the execution of a security lien statement and the required fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) and registration card.

If a vehicle is subject to the security interest when brought into this state, the validity of the security interest is determined by the law of the jurisdiction where the vehicle was when the security interest attached, subject to the following:

If the parties understood at the time the security interest attached that the vehicle would be kept in this state and it was brought into this state within the following thirty (30) days for purposes other than transportation through this state, the validity of the security interest in this state is determined by the law of this state.

If the security interest was perfected under the law of the jurisdiction where the vehicle was when the security interest attached, the following rules apply:

If the name of the lienholder is shown on an existing certificate of title issued by that jurisdiction, his security interest continues perfected in this state.

If the name of the lienholder is not shown on an existing certificate of title issued by that jurisdiction, the security interest continues perfected in this state for four (4) months after a first certificate of title of the vehicle is issued in this state and beyond that if, within the four (4) month period, it is perfected in this state. The security interest may also be perfected in this state after the expiration of the four (4) month period. If done at that time, perfection dates from the time of perfection in this state.

If the security interest was not perfected under the law of the jurisdiction where the vehicle was when the security interest attached, it may be perfected in this state. If done at that time, perfection dates from the time of perfection in this state.

A security interest may be perfected under subsection (c)(2)(ii) or subsection (c)(3) either as provided in subsection (b), or by the lienholder delivering to the division of motor vehicles a notice of security interest in the form the division of motor vehicles prescribes and the required fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 46, § 2; P.L. 1975, ch. 245, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 13, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 15, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 182, § 11; P.L. 2000, ch. 420, § 11; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 9, § 1.

31-3.1-20.
Security interest — Change of certificate.

If an owner creates a security interest in a vehicle:

The owner shall immediately execute the application, in the space provided for it on the certificate of title or on a separate form the division of motor vehicles prescribes, to name the lienholder on the certificate, showing the name and address of the lienholder and the date of his security agreement, and cause the certificate of application and the required fee and registration card to be delivered to the lienholder.

The lienholder shall immediately cause the certificate, application, and the required fee and registration card to be mailed or delivered to the division of motor vehicles.

Upon request of the owner or subordinate lienholder, a lienholder in possession of the certificate of title shall either mail or deliver the certificate to the subordinate lienholder for delivery to the division of motor vehicles or, upon receipt from the subordinate lienholder of the owner’s application and the required fee and registration card, mail or deliver them to the division of motor vehicles with the certificate. The delivery of the certificate does not affect the rights of the first lienholder under his or her security agreement.

Upon receipt of the certificate of title, the application, the required fee of fifty dollars ($50.00), and the registration card, the division of motor vehicles shall either endorse on the certificate or issue a new certificate containing the name and address of the new lienholder, and mail the certificate to the first lienholder named in it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 15, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 85, § 6; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 9, § 1.

31-3.1-21.
Assignment by lienholder.

A lienholder may assign, absolutely or otherwise, his or her security interest in the vehicle to a person other than the owner without affecting the interest of the owner or the validity of the security interest, but any person without notice of the assignment is protected in dealing with the lienholder as the holder of the security interest, and the lienholder remains liable for any obligations as lienholder until the assignee is named as lienholder on the certificate.

The assignee may, but need not to perfect the assignment, have the certificate of title endorsed or issued with the assignee named as lienholder, upon delivering to the division of motor vehicles the certificate and an assignment by the lienholder named in the certificate in the form the division of motor vehicles prescribes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-22.
Release of security interest.

Upon the satisfaction of a security interest in a vehicle for which the certificate of title is in the possession of the lienholder, the lienholder shall, within fifteen (15) business days, execute a release of his or her security interest, in the space provided for it on the certificate or as the division of motor vehicles prescribes, and mail or deliver the certificate and release to the next lienholder named in it, or, if none, to the owner or any person who delivers to the lienholder an authorization from the owner to receive the certificate. The owner, other than a dealer holding the vehicle for resale, shall promptly cause the certificate and release to be mailed or delivered to the division of motor vehicles, which shall release the lienholder’s rights on the certificate or issue a new certificate.

Upon the satisfaction of a security interest in a vehicle for which the certificate of title is in the possession of a prior lienholder, the lienholder whose security interest is satisfied shall within ten (10) days execute a release in the form the division of motor vehicles prescribes and deliver the release to the owner or to any person who delivers to the lienholder an authorization from the owner to receive it. The lienholder in possession of the certificate of title shall either deliver the certificate to the owner, or the person authorized by him or her, for delivery to the division of motor vehicles, or, upon receipt of the release and registration card, mail or deliver them with the certificate to the division of motor vehicles which shall release the subordinate lienholder’s rights on the certificate or issue a new certificate.

It shall be unlawful for the lienholder to charge any fee for the delivery of the certificate and release.

Failure of the lienholder to provide the certificate and release as required by this section shall subject the lienholder to liability for any damages to the owner caused by that failure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 377, § 1.

31-3.1-23.
Duty of lienholder.

A lienholder named in a certificate of title shall, upon written request of the owner or of another lienholder named on the certificate, disclose any pertinent information as to his or her security agreement and the indebtedness secured by it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-24.
Exclusiveness of procedure.

The method provided in this chapter of perfecting and giving notice of security interests subject to the chapter is exclusive. Security interests subject to this chapter are exempted from the provisions of law which prescribe technical requirements in execution or acknowledgment of or otherwise require or relate to the filing of instruments creating or evidencing security interests.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-25.
Suspension or revocation of certificates.

The division of motor vehicles shall suspend or revoke a certificate of title, upon notice and reasonable opportunity to be heard in accordance with §

31-3.1-36

, when authorized by any other provision of law or if it finds:

The certificate of title was fraudulently procured or erroneously issued;

The vehicle has been scrapped, dismantled or destroyed; or

Upon request of the tax administrator after notice and reasonable opportunity to be heard by the tax administrator, that the taxes specified in §

31-3.1-10(4)

have not been paid.

Suspension or revocation of a certificate of title does not, in itself, affect the validity of a security interest noted on it.

When the division of motor vehicles suspends or revokes a certificate of title, the owner or person in possession of it shall, immediately upon receiving notice of the suspension or revocation, mail or deliver the certificate to the division of motor vehicles.

The division of motor vehicles may seize and impound any certificate of title which has been suspended or revoked.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 263, art. VI, § 2.

31-3.1-26.
Powers of division of motor vehicles.

The division of motor vehicles shall prescribe and provide suitable forms of applications, certificates of title, notices of security interests, and all other notices and forms necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

The division of motor vehicles may:

Make necessary investigations to procure information required to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

Assign a new identifying number to a vehicle if it has none, or its identifying number is destroyed or obliterated, or its motor is changed and shall either issue a new certificate of title showing the new identifying number or make an appropriate endorsement on the original certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1.

31-3.1-27.
Vehicle leases that are not sales or security interests.

In the case of motor vehicles or trailers, notwithstanding any other provision of law, a transaction does not create a sale or security interest merely because it provides that the rental price is permitted or required to be adjusted under the agreement either upward or downward by reference to the amount realized upon sale or other disposition of the motor vehicle or trailer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 305, § 8.

31-3.1-28 — 31-3.1-35.
[Obsolete.]

31-3.1-36.
Court review.

A person aggrieved by an act or omission to act of the division of motor vehicles under this chapter is entitled to a review by the sixth division of the district court in accordance with the administrative procedure act of this state. A party aggrieved by a final order of the court may seek review in the supreme court by writ of certiorari in accordance with the procedures contained in §

42-35-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 13.

31-3.1-37.
Passage of title upon death of owner.

Unless otherwise provided in the last will and testament of a decedent, any motor vehicle(s) owned by the decedent shall belong, and title to them shall pass, to the surviving spouse.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall register the motor vehicle(s) in the name of the surviving spouse upon presentation to the division of motor vehicles of:

A certified copy of the death certificate of the deceased spouse;

Registration(s) of the motor vehicle(s) of the deceased spouse.

No fee shall be charged to the surviving spouse for issuance of a new certificate of title.

A surviving spouse shall not be charged a registration fee during the year he or she is registering the vehicle(s) in his or her name and having a new certificate of title issued,

Where the deceased spouse registered that motor vehicle(s) with the division of motor vehicles; and

Paid the registration fees provided in §

31-6-1

for the motor vehicle(s) for the year.

Where the deceased spouse did not register the motor vehicle(s) or failed to pay a registration fee pursuant to §

31-6-1

for the year in which the surviving spouse appears to register the motor vehicle(s) and have a new title certificate issued in his or her name, then the surviving spouse shall pay a pro rata amount of the annual registration fee for the remaining months of the year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 27.

31-3.1-38.
Effective dates — Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to all model vehicles designated as 2001 models and all subsequent model year vehicles. All vehicles designated as model years prior to 2001 shall be excluded from these provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 100, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 58; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 7, § 4.